Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-6,184
Restrictions on driving over unprotected fire hose.

No vehicle shall be driven over unprotected hose of a fire department when laid down on any highway or private road or driveway, in use or to be used at any fire or alarm of fire, without the consent of the fire department official in command.

Laws 1973, LB 45, § 82;

R.S.1943, (1988), § 39-682;

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 280.